Massachusetts, session 194th, H3445.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 25A of the General Laws, as amended by section 41 of chapter 179 of the acts of 
2022, is hereby further amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 21. (a) The office in coordination with the department, as defined in section 3, 
shall establish a program to promote, support and encourage the construction, installation and 
operation of solar panels at K-12 public schools in districts across the commonwealth including, 
municipal and state education offices. The program shall increase overall renewable energy 
generation and improve energy efficiency through the installation of solar panels at K-12 public 
schools. 
(b) The program shall include: 

of 3 10  (i) incentives to encourage the construction, installation and operation of solar panels, 
which may include construction requirements, incentive payments, tax reductions or deferrals, 
loans or grants, expedited interconnection requirements, zoning or other regulatory preferences 
which may include, increasing the amount of the incentive through the state’s current or future 
solar incentive program for solar panel installation at K-12 public schools; 
(ii) expanding installation of solar panels in the commonwealth; 
(iii) maximizing the energy use savings of solar panels at K-12 public schools in the 
commonwealth; 
(iv) expand the availability of solar panel electric vehicle charging infrastructure 
including, but not limited to: (i) technical assistance; (ii) demonstrations; and (iii) identification 
and implementation of cost-effective energy efficiency, energy storage and electric vehicle 
charging infrastructure measures and programs in existing and planned buildings or facilities of 
K-12 public schools in the commonwealth; 
(v) roof quality evaluations when considering the installation of solar panels at K-12 
public schools; and 
(vi) such other criteria and conditions necessary for an efficient and effective installation 
of solar panels at K-12 public schools in the commonwealth. 
(c) In designing the program, the department shall: 
(i) consult with an advisory working group to make recommendations concerning the 
design and operation of the program. The members of the advisory working group shall be 
appointed by the secretary and shall include: (i) a representative of the department of energy 

of 3 31 resources, who shall chair the working group; (ii) a representative of the department elementary 
and secondary education; (iii) a representative of organized labor; (iv) a representative of the 
solar energy industry; (v) a representative of an environmental group concerned with energy; (vi) 
a representative of the construction industry; (vii) a representative of an electric utility or 
organization representing electric utilities; (viii) a representative of local government in the 
commonwealth; (ix) a person with expertise in energy siting; and (x) a person with expertise in 
solar energy and energy efficiency; 
(ii) review the design, installation and operation of solar panels proposed or in operation 
in other states; 
(iii) review cost and benefit analysis of K-12 public schools leasing solar panels rather 
than operating solar panels; 
(iv) review the federal Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 for possible funding for the 
installation of solar panels at K-12 public schools; and 
(v) hold not fewer than 3 public hearings in different regions of the commonwealth to 
receive public testimony and input on the program including, but not limited to, proposals by K-
12 public school districts with 1 or multiple future projects for installation of solar panels. 
(d) The department shall promulgate regulations as necessary to implement the program. 
(e) If statutory changes are necessary to implement the program, the department shall 
make specific recommendations to the general court for required changes in law.